Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Stop the Salary
Spike Act of 2026".


Req. No. 15519 Page 1

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 250.4, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 191, O.S.L. 2025 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 250.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 250.4. Pursuant to provisions of the Constitution of
the State of Oklahoma from and after the beginning date of a term of
office which commences in, or after, January 2016, and except as
otherwise provided by this section, the following officers of the
State of Oklahoma shall be annually compensated for their services,
payable monthly, as follows:
1. The Governor shall receive a salary of One Hundred Forty-
seven Thousand Dollars ($147,000.00);
2. The Lieutenant Governor shall receive a salary of One
Hundred Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen Dollars
($114,713.00);
3. The Attorney General shall receive a salary of One Hundred
Thirty-two Thousand Eight Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($132,825.00);
4. The State Superintendent of Public Instruction shall receive
a salary of One Hundred Twenty-four Thousand Three Hundred Seventy-
three Dollars ($124,373.00);
5. Each member of the Corporation Commission shall receive a
salary of One Hundred Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen
Dollars ($114,713.00);
6. The State Treasurer shall receive a salary of One Hundred
Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen Dollars ($114,713.00);
Req. No. 15519 Page 2

7. The State Auditor and Inspector shall receive a salary of
One Hundred Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen Dollars
($114,713.00);
8. The State Insurance Commissioner shall receive a salary of
One Hundred Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen Dollars
($114,713.00); and
9. The Commissioner of Labor shall receive a salary of One
Hundred Five Thousand Fifty-three Dollars ($105,053.00).
B. With respect to any public official whose salary is provided
for by this section, the provisions of this section shall be
operative until the Statewide Official Compensation Commission
modifies the salary amount for such official. If the Statewide
Official Compensation Commission modifies the salary amount as
otherwise prescribed by this section, the order of the Commission
shall supersede the provisions of this section with respect to the
appliable statewide elected official.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
All actions taken by the Statewide Official Compensation
Commission prior to the effective date of this act with respect to
the salary of any official the salary of which is provided for in
Section 250.4 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be deemed
null and void and shall not modify any of the provisions of Section

Req. No. 15519 Page 3

250. 4 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes with respect to the
salary of any elected statewide elected official.
SECTION 4. REPEALER Section 1, Chapter 191, O.S.L. 2025
(74 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 291.4), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 5. REPEALER Section 3, Chapter 191, O.S.L. 2025,
is hereby repealed.
SECTION 6. REPEALER Section 5, Chapter 191, O.S.L. 2025,
is hereby repealed.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15519 MAH 12/29/25













Req. No. 15519 Page 4